Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle B. Other Elections.

§ 23-15-351.
Authority to print ballots; penalties.

It shall be the duty of the chair of the election commission of each county to have printed all necessary ballots for use in elections, except ballots in municipal elections which shall be printed as herein provided by the authorities of the respective municipalities; and the election commissioner shall cause the official ballot to be printed by a printer sworn to keep the ballots secret under the penalties prescribed by law. The printer shall deliver to the election commissioners for holding elections, a certificate of the number of ballots printed for each precinct, and shall not print any additional ballots, except on instruction of proper election commissioners; and failure to observe either of these requirements shall be a misdemeanor.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-119 [Codes, 1892, § 3651; 1906, § 4158; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6792; 1930, § 6224; 1942, § 3253; Laws, 1968, ch. 571, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 105; Laws, 2001, ch. 301, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 75, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-353.
Sufficient ballots to be printed and distributed.

The officer charged with printing and distributing the official ballot shall ascertain from the registrar, at least ten (10) days before the day of election, the number of registered voters in each voting precinct; and he or she shall have printed and distributed a sufficient number of ballots for use in each precinct.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-121 [Codes, 1892, § 3659; 1906, § 4166; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6800; 1930, § 6225; 1942, § 3254; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 106; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 76, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-355.
Payment of ballot expenses.

Ballots in all elections shall be printed and distributed at public expense and shall be known as “official ballots.” The expense of printing the ballots shall be paid out of the county treasury, except that in municipal elections such expenses shall be paid by the respective cities, towns and villages.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-123 [Codes, 1892, § 3650; 1906, § 4157; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6791; 1930, § 6226; 1942, § 3255; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 107; Laws, 2001, ch. 301, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 77, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-357.
Back and outside of ballot.

On the back and outside of the ballot shall be printed the words “OFFICIAL BALLOT,” the name of the voting precinct or place for which the ballot is prepared, and the date of the election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-125 [Codes, 1892, § 3657; 1906, § 4164; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6798; 1930, § 6227; 1942, § 3256; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 108, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-359.
Names of candidates to be printed on ballot; filing of petition for office; inapplicability of section to municipal elections; special elections; determination of candidate’s qualifications; declaration of nominee in single candidate race.

Except as provided in this section, the ballot shall contain the names of all party nominees certified by the appropriate executive committee, and independent and special election candidates who have timely filed petitions containing the required signatures and assessments that must be paid pursuant to Section 23-15-297, if the candidates and nominees meet all of the qualifications to hold the office sought. A petition requesting that an independent or special election candidate’s name be placed on the ballot for any office shall be filed as provided for in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, as appropriate, and shall be signed by not less than the following number of qualified electors:

For an office elected by the state at large, not less than one thousand (1,000) qualified electors.

For an office elected by the qualified electors of a Supreme Court district, not less than three hundred (300) qualified electors.

For an office elected by the qualified electors of a congressional district, not less than two hundred (200) qualified electors.

For an office elected by the qualified electors of a circuit or chancery court district, not less than one hundred (100) qualified electors.

For an office elected by the qualified electors of a senatorial or representative district, not less than fifty (50) qualified electors.

For an office elected by the qualified electors of a county, not less than fifty (50) qualified electors.

For an office elected by the qualified electors of a supervisors district or justice court district, not less than fifteen (15) qualified electors.

For the Office of President of the United States, a party nominee or independent candidate shall pay an assessment in the amount of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00).

Unless the petition or fee, whichever is applicable, required above shall be filed as provided for in subsection (3), (4) or (5) of this section, as appropriate, the name of the person requested to be a candidate, unless nominated by a political party, shall not be placed upon the ballot. The ballot shall contain the names of each candidate for each office, and the names shall be listed under the name of the political party that candidate represents as provided by law and as certified to the circuit clerk by the state executive committee of the political party. In the event the candidate qualifies as an independent as provided in this section, he or she shall be listed on the ballot as an independent candidate.

The name of an independent or special election candidate who dies before the printing of the ballots, shall not be placed on the ballots.

Petitions for offices described in paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d) and (e) of subsection (1) of this section shall be filed with the Secretary of State by no later than 5:00 p.m. on the same date or business day, as applicable, by which candidates are required to pay the fee provided for in Section 23-15-297; however, no petition may be filed before January 1 of the year in which the election for the office is held.

Petitions for offices described in paragraphs (f) and (g) of subsection (1) of this section shall be filed with the proper circuit clerk by no later than 5:00 p.m. on the same date by which candidates are required to pay the fee provided for in Section 23-15-297; however, no petition may be filed before January 1 of the year in which the election for the office is held. The circuit clerk shall notify the county election commissioners of all persons who have filed petitions with the clerk. The notification shall occur within two (2) business days and shall contain all necessary information.

The assessment for the office described in paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of this section shall be paid to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall deposit any qualifying fees received from candidates into the Elections Support Fund established in Section 23-15-5.

The election commissioners may also have printed upon the ballot any local issue election matter that is authorized to be held on the same date as the regular or general election pursuant to Section 23-15-375; however, the ballot form of the local issue must be filed with the election commissioners by the appropriate governing authority not less than sixty (60) days before the date of the election.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to municipal elections or to the election of the offices of justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, chancellor, county court judge and family court judge.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit special elections to fill vacancies in either house of the Legislature from being held as provided in Section 23-15-851. In all elections conducted under the provisions of Section 23-15-851, there shall be printed on the ballot the name of any candidate who, not having been nominated by a political party, shall have been requested to be a candidate for any office by a petition filed with the Secretary of State and signed by not less than fifty (50) qualified electors.

The appropriate election commission shall determine whether each candidate is a qualified elector of the state, state district, county or county district they seek to serve, and whether each candidate meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office. The election commission shall determine whether the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election. The election commission also shall determine whether any candidate has been convicted (i) of any felony in a court of this state, (ii) on or after December 8, 1992, of any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, (iii) of any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992, or (iv) of any offense that involved the misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office. Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state.

If the appropriate election commission finds that a candidate either (i) is not a qualified elector, (ii) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, or (iii) has been convicted of a felony or other disqualifying offense as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and not pardoned, then the election commission shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard. The election commission shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms. If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove that he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of such candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot. If the appropriate election commission determines that the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election, the action required by Section 23-15-905, shall be taken.

If after the deadline to qualify as a candidate for an office or after the time for holding any party primary for an office, only one (1) person has duly qualified to be a candidate for the office in the general election, the name of that person shall be placed on the ballot; provided, however, that if not more than one (1) person duly qualified to be a candidate for each office on the general election ballot, the election for all offices on the ballot shall be dispensed with and the appropriate election commission shall declare each candidate elected without opposition if the candidate meets all the qualifications to hold the office as determined pursuant to a review by the election commission in accordance with the provisions of subsection (9) of this section and if the candidate has filed all required campaign finance disclosure reports as required by Section 23-15-807.

The petition required by this section may not be filed by using the Internet.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-134 [Laws, 1978, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 477, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 109; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 431, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 336, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 15; Laws, 2007, ch. 570, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 604, § 4; Laws, 2008, ch. 554, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 320, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 380, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 362, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 23-15-361.
Names of municipal office candidates to be printed on ballot; filing of petition for municipal office; determination of candidate’s qualifications; declaration of nominee in single candidate race.

The municipal general election ballot shall contain the names of all candidates who have been put in nomination by the municipal primary election of any political party. There shall be printed on the ballots the names of all persons so nominated, whether the nomination be otherwise known or not, upon the written request of one or more of the candidates so nominated, or of any qualified elector who will make oath that he or she was a participant in the primary election, and that the person whose name is presented by him or her was nominated by such primary election. The municipal election commissioners who are required to have the ballots printed, shall also have printed on the ballot in any municipal general election the name of any candidate who, not having been nominated by a political party, shall have been requested to be a candidate for any office by a petition filed with the clerk of the municipality no later than 5:00 p.m. on the same date by which candidates for nomination in the municipal primary elections are required to pay the fee provided for in Section 23-15-309, and signed by not less than the following number of qualified electors:

For an office elected by the qualified electors of a municipality or a municipal district having a population of one thousand (1,000) or more, not less than fifty (50) qualified electors.

For an office elected by the qualified electors of a municipality or a municipal district having a population of less than one thousand (1,000), not less than fifteen (15) qualified electors.

Unless the petition required above shall be filed no later than 5:00 p.m. on the same date by which candidates for nomination in the municipal primary election are required to pay the fee provided for in Section 23-15-309, the name of the person requested to be a candidate, unless nominated by a political party, shall not be placed upon the ballot. The ballot shall contain the names of each candidate for each municipal office, and the names shall be listed under the name of the political party the candidate represents as provided by law and as certified to the municipal clerk by the municipal executive committee of such political party. In the event such candidate qualifies as an independent as herein provided, he or she shall be listed on the ballot as an independent candidate.

The clerk of the municipality shall notify the municipal election commissioners of all persons who have filed petitions pursuant to subsection (1) of this section within two (2) business days of the date of filing.

The ballot in elections to fill vacancies in municipal elective office shall contain the names of all persons who have qualified as required by Section 23-15-857.

The municipal election commission shall determine whether each party candidate in the municipal general election is a qualified elector of the municipality, and of the ward if the office sought is a ward office and shall determine whether each candidate either meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office. The municipal election commission also shall determine whether any candidate has been convicted of any felony in a court of this state, or has been convicted on or after December 8, 1992, of any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, or has been convicted of any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992. Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state unless such offense also involved misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office. If the municipal election commission finds that a candidate either (a) is not a qualified elector, (b) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, or (c) has been convicted of a felony as described above and not pardoned, then the election commission shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard. The election commission shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms. If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of the candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot.

If after the deadline to qualify as a candidate for an office or after the time for holding any party primary election for an office, only one (1) person has duly qualified to be a candidate for the office in the general election the name of that person shall be placed on the ballot; provided, however, that if not more than one (1) person has duly qualified to be a candidate for each office on the general election ballot, the election for all offices on the ballot shall be dispensed with and the municipal election commission shall declare each candidate elected without opposition if the candidate meets all the qualifications to hold the office as determined pursuant to a review by the election commission in accordance with the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and if the candidate has filed all required campaign finance disclosure reports as required by Section 23-15-807.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-134 [Laws, 1978, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 477, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 110; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 336, § 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 380, § 8; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 79, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-363.
Names of candidates who have not duly withdrawn not omitted from ballot.

After the proper officer has knowledge of or has been notified of the nomination, as provided, of any candidate for office, the officer shall not omit his name from the ballot, unless upon the written request of the candidate nominated, made at least ten (10) days before the election, and in no case after such ballot has been printed; and every ballot shall contain the names of all candidates nominated as specified, and not duly withdrawn.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-135 [Codes, 1892, § 3655; 1906, § 4162; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6796; 1930, § 6232; 1942, § 3261; Laws, 1944, ch. 169; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex ch. 12; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 25; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 111, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-365.
Write-in candidates; blank space on general, special and primary election ballots; applicability of section to elections conducted under Sections 23-15-974 through 23-15-985.

In general and special elections, one (1) blank space shall be left on each ballot under the title of each office to be voted for, and in the event of the death, resignation, withdrawal or removal of any candidate whose name was printed on the official ballot, the name of the candidate duly substituted in the place of such candidate who is qualified to hold the office may be written in the blank space by the voter.

In all primary elections, one (1) blank space shall be left on each ballot under the title of each office to be voted for, and in the event of the death, resignation, or withdrawal of a candidate, the name of any individual who is qualified to hold the office may be written in the blank space by the voter.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to elections conducted under the Nonpartisan Judicial Election Act.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §25-5-137 [Codes, 1892, § 3653; 1906, § 4160; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6794; 1930, § 6233; 1942, § 3262; Laws, 1984, ch. 439, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 337]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 112; Laws, 2011, ch. 509, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 80, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-367.
Printing of official ballot generally; order in which titles of various offices are to be listed on the ballot; furnishing of sample of official ballot; alphabetical arrangement in primary elections.

Except as otherwise provided by Sections 23-15-974 through 23-15-985 and subsection (2) of this section, the size, print and quality of paper of the official ballot is left to the discretion of the officer charged with printing the official ballot.

The titles for the various offices shall be listed in the following order:

Candidates, electors or delegates for the following national offices:

President;

United States Senator or United States Representative;

Candidates for the following statewide office: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, Commissioner of Insurance;

Candidates for the following state district offices: Mississippi Transportation Commissioner, Public Service Commissioner, District Attorney;

Candidates for the following legislative offices: Senate and House of Representatives;

Candidates for countywide office;

Candidates for county district office.

The order in which the titles for the various offices are listed within paragraphs (e) and (f) is left to the discretion of the county election commissioners. Nominees of the political parties, qualified to conduct primary elections as defined in Section 23-15-291, shall be listed first alphabetically by the candidate’s last name, followed by any other candidates listed alphabetically by last name.

It is the duty of the Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, to furnish the designated election commissioner of each county a sample of the official ballot, not less than fifty-five (55) days before the election, the general form of which shall be followed as nearly as practicable.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-139 [Codes, 1892, § 3656; 1906, § 4163; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6797; 1930, § 6234; 1942, § 3263; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 26; Laws, 1978, ch. 391, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 401, § 5; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 113; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 92; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 8; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 81, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-369.
Form and substance of proposed constitutional amendment or other public measure.

Whenever a constitutional amendment is submitted to the vote of the people, the substance of the amendment shall be printed in clear and unambiguous language on the ballot after the list of candidates, if any, followed by the word “YES” and also by the word “NO”, and shall be styled in such a manner that a “YES” vote will indicate approval of the proposal and a “NO” vote will indicate rejection.

The substance of the amendment shall be an explanatory statement not exceeding seventy-five (75) words in length of the chief purpose of the measure. The statement shall be prepared by the Legislature and included in the concurrent resolution proposing the amendment to the Constitution. The statement shall avoid, whenever possible, the use of legal terminology or jargon and shall use instead, simple, ordinary, everyday language. The Secretary of State shall give each proposed constitutional amendment a designating number for convenient reference specific to the election in which the amendment appears on the ballot. This number designation shall appear on the ballot. Designating numbers shall be assigned in the order of filing or certification of the amendments. The Secretary of State shall furnish the designating number and the substance of each amendment to the circuit clerk of each county in which the amendment is to be voted on.

The full text of each proposed constitutional amendment shall be published by the Secretary of State as provided for in Section 7-3-39, and shall be posted prominently in all polling places, with copies of the proposed amendment to be otherwise available at each polling place.

Except as may be otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section, whenever any public measure, question or matter that requires an affirmative or negative vote is submitted to a vote of the electors, the measure or matter shall be printed on the ballot and also the words “FOR” or “AGAINST” to be so arranged by the proper officer so that the voter can intelligently vote his or her preference.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-141 [Codes, 1892, § 3654; 1906, § 4161; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6795; 1930, § 6235; 1942, § 3264; repealed, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335; repealed, Laws, 1986, ch. 501, § 2] and §23-5-142 [Laws, 1979, ch. 502, § 1; repealed, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 33; repealed, Laws, 1986, ch. 501, § 2]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 114; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 82, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-371.
Loss or destruction of official ballots.

In case the official ballots prepared shall be lost or destroyed, the election commissioners shall have like ballots furnished in place of those lost or destroyed, if time remain therefor. If from any cause there should be no official ballots or an insufficient number at a voting place, and not sufficient time in which to have them printed, the ballots may be written; but, if written by anyone except the voter alone for himself or herself, the names of all candidates shall be written thereon, without any mark or device by which one (1) name may be distinguished from another, and the ballots shall be marked by the voter as provided for printed ballots. If the poll manager designated fails to have the ballots at the voting place at the proper time, or if he or she fails to distribute them, the poll managers, or those of them present at the election, shall provide ballots, and select some suitable person to distribute them, who shall take the oath required of the poll managers, and distribute the ballots according to law.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-143 [Codes, 1892, § 3661; 1906, § 4168; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6802; 1930, § 6236; 1942, § 3265; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 115; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 83, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-373.
Report regarding lost ballots.

Within one (1) day after election day, the poll managers shall report to the election commissioners, under oath, as to the loss of official ballots, the number lost, and all facts connected therewith, which report the commissioners may deliver to the grand jury, if deemed advisable.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-145 [Codes, 1892, § 3662; 1906, § 4169; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6803; 1930, § 6237; 1942, § 3266; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 116; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 84, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-375.
Local issues.

Local issue elections may be held on the same date as any regular or general election. A local issue election held on the same date as the regular or general election shall be conducted in the same manner as the regular or general election using the same poll workers and the same equipment. A local issue may be placed on the regular or general election ballot pursuant to the provisions of Section 23-15-359. The provisions of this section and Section 23-15-359 with regard to local issue elections shall not be construed to affect any statutory requirements specifying the notice procedure and the necessary percentage of qualified electors voting in such an election which is needed for adoption of the local issue. Whether or not a local issue is adopted or defeated at a local issue election held on the same day as a regular or general election shall be determined in accordance with relevant statutory requirements regarding the necessary percentage of qualified electors who voted in the local issue election, and only those persons voting for or against the issue shall be counted in making that determination. As used in this section “local issue elections” include elections regarding the issuance of bonds, local option elections, elections regarding the levy of additional ad valorem taxes and other similar elections authorized by law that are called to consider issues that affect a single local governmental entity. As used in this section “local issue” means any issue that may be voted on in a local issue election.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 85, eff from and after July 1, 2017.